Utah statutes.
63M-1-2302.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Broadband service" means any wire line technology identified by the director as having the capacity to transmit data from and to a subscriber's computer to the Internet or Internet-related services at a minimum rate of data transmission of 256 kilobits per second.

(2)  "Provider" means a person who will provide retail broadband service to subscribers in a rural area.

(3)  "Restricted account" means the Rural Broadband Service Account created in Section 63M-1-2303.

(4)  "Rural area" means any territory in the state:

(a)  within a city, town, or unincorporated area with a population of 10,000 or less based on the most recently published data of the United States Census Bureau; and

(b)  in which broadband service is not available.

